Washington statutes.
RCW 39.30.070

Exceptions—Contracts or development agreements related to stadium and exhibition center.

This chapter does not apply to contracts entered into under RCW 36.102.060(4) or development agreements entered into under RCW 36.102.060(7).

[ 1997 c 220 s 403 (Referendum Bill No. 48, approved June 17, 1997).]

NOTES:

Referendum—Other legislation limited—Legislators' personal intent not indicated—Reimbursements for election—Voters' pamphlet, election requirements—1997 c 220: See RCW 36.102.800 through 36.102.803.